Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.20
Manufacturer, defined.

Manufacturer means every
brewer, fermenter, distiller, rectifier, winemaker, blender, processor, bottler,
or person who fills or refills an original package and others engaged in brewing,
fermenting, distilling, rectifying, or bottling alcoholic liquor, including
a wholly owned affiliate or duly authorized agent for a manufacturer.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 28.